test/src/morphology/V-eraetuemae71_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - erätümä: # Verb (71) erätümä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     erätümä+V+Inf/mA: erätümä
     erätümä+V+Inf: erätüdäq
     erätümä+V+ActPrtPrc: erätünüq
     erätümä+V+PssPrtPrc: erätüt
     erätümä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: erädü
     erätümä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: erätüs
     erätümä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: erädü
     erätümä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: erätü
